apertium-zab.zab.lexd
LEXICON V-Extender(2)       # FIXME
<pol>:>la                   <pol>:>làaʼ
#:                           :

#LEXICON Caus
#
#<caus>:su
#:


LEXICON Aux(2)

abenton        abentoon         # "ride"
alabar         alabaar          # "praise"
arreglad       arreglaad        # "arrange for"
bda            bdaa             # "cat a shadow, give shade"
bgw            bgwah            # "tie (a knot)"
bisy           biʼsy            # "let (someone) know"
cas            caʼs             # "pay attention to"
castiu         castiʼu          # "punish"
col            coʼoll           # "stand in line"
company        compaʼanny       # "accompany"
comprender     comprendeer      # "understand"
contest        connteʼst        # "answer"
dany           daany            # "make (someone) sick; damage"
defender       defendeer        # "defend"
fald           faʼlld           # "do something wrong somewhere; miss / be absent from somewhere"
gan            gaan             # "earn, win"
gaxt           gaʼaxt           # "spend money"
guan           guuhahnn         # "make charitable donation"
mandad         mandaad          # "run an errand; give someone an errand"
nadar          nadaar           # "swim"
protestar      protestaar       # "protest"
sospechar      sohspechaar      # "suspect"
tomar\ fot     tomaar\ foʼt     # "take a picture (of)"
uas            uaʼs             # "use"
xgab:xgab      x꞉gaʼab:x꞉gaʼab  # "think"
xgab:xjab      x꞉gaʼab:x꞉jaʼab  # "think"    ! Dir/LR
xten           x꞉tèeʼn          # "work as"
zeiny          zèèiʼny          # "work"


LEXICON V-Stems-Irreg(3)[nonperf,nonp1pl]

#        |  -perf   |  +perf  |
# -----------------------------
#  -p1pl |    uny   |   einy  |
# -----------------------------
#  +p1pl |   ieny   |   ieny  |
# -----------------------------

# uny for everything but perf and p1pl
uny:uny uny:uhny                                 <tv> # "do"
uny:un  uny:un                                   <tv> # "do"  Dir/LR Orth/SJGZ
# ieny for all p1pl
uny[-nonp1pl]:ieny[-nonp1pl]    uny[-nonp1pl]:ieʼny[-nonp1pl]         <tv> # "do"
uny[-nonp1pl,-nonperf]:ieny[-nonp1pl,-nonperf]    uny[-nonp1pl,-nonperf]:ieʼny[-nonp1pl,-nonperf]         <tv> # "do"
#uny[p1pl]:ieny[p1pl]              uhny[p1pl]:ieʼny[p1pl]                   <tv> # "do"

# einy for perf except with p1pl
uny[-nonperf]:einy[-nonperf]  uny[-nonperf]:èiʼny[-nonperf]                   <tv> # "do"


LEXICON V-Stems-IrregAspect(3)
ap:rap                ap:ràaʼp  <tv><hab>    # "have"
ap:gup                ap:gùuʼp  <tv><perf>   # "have"

u:ru                  u:ruʼuh   <iv><hab>    # "be located"
u:gu                  u:guʼuh   <iv><perf>   # "be located"
u:chu                 u:chuʼuh  <iv><irre>   # "be located"
u:nu                  u:nuʼuh   <iv><neut>   # "be located (neutral)"

une:rune              une:ruʼuhnèe   <iv><hab>    # "live with"
une:gune              une:guʼuhnèe   <iv><perf>   # "live with"
une:chune             une:chuʼuhnèe  <iv><irre>   # "live with"
une:nune              une:nuʼnèe     <iv><neut>   # "live with (neutral)"
une:nune              une:nuʼuhnèe   <iv><neut>   # "live with (neutral)" ! Dir/LR

ac:gac                ac:gaʼc   <iv><irre>   # "be, become"
ac:nac                ac:naaʼc  <iv><neut>   # "be, become (neutral)"
ac:guc                ac:guhc   <iv><perf>   # "be, become"
ac:rac                ac:rahc   <iv><hab>    # "be, become"

acxu:gacxu            acxu:gaʼcx꞉ùu   <iv><irre>   # "get sick"
acxu:nacxu            acxu:naaʼcx꞉ùu  <iv><neut>   #
acxu:gucxu            acxu:guhcx꞉ùu   <iv><perf>   #
acxu:racxu            acxu:rahcx꞉ùu   <iv><hab>    #

acbe:gacbe            acbe:gaʼcbèeʼ   <iv><irre>   # "understand, know"
acbe:nacbe            acbe:naaʼcbèeʼ  <iv><neut>   #
acbe:gucbe            acbe:guhcbèeʼ   <iv><perf>   #
acbe:racbe            acbe:rahcbèeʼ   <iv><hab>    #

ile:rile              ile:rilleʼeh   <iv><hab>    # "be able to, know how to"
ile:gule              ile:gulleʼeh   <iv><perf>   # 
ile:chile             ile:chilleʼeh  <iv><irre>   #
ile:zale              ile:zalleʼeh   <iv><def>    # 

# FIXME: p1pl forms of ria
ia:ria                ia:rihah       <iv><hab>    # "go"
ia:gwe                ia:gweheh      <iv><perf>   #
ia:chia               ia:chiia       <iv><irre>   #
ia:ze                 ia:zeheh       <iv><def>    #
ia:ze                 ia:zèe         <iv><inch>   #

yet:rgyet             yet:rgyeʼeht   <iv><hab>    # "play"
yet:bzuat             yet:bzuʼaht    <iv><perf>   #
yet:cyet              yet:cyeʼt      <iv><irre>   #

# See Cali Chiu Vol 2, Lecsyony Tseinyabchon (

atga:ratga            atga:ràaʼtgaʼah <iv><hab>   # "lie down (in a location)"
atga:natga            atga:nàaʼtgaʼah <iv><neut>  #
atga:guatga           atga:gùaʼtgaʼah <iv><perf>  #

beb:rbeb              beb:rbèeʼb     <iv><hab>    # "get (put) into position (on a surface)"
beb:wbeb              beb:wbèeʼb     <iv><perf>   #
beb:cweb              beb:cwèeʼb     <iv><irre>   #
beb:beb               beb:bèeʼb      <iv><neut>   #

zeiby:zeiby           zeiby:zèèiʼby  <iv><neut>   # "be hanging"
zeiby:rzeiby          zeiby:rzèèiʼby <iv><hab>    #
zeiby:seiby           zeiby:sèèiʼby  <iv><irre>   #

zub:rzub              zub:rzùuʼb     <iv><hab>    # "get/be placed (in a location)"
zub:sub               zub:sùuʼb      <iv><irre>   #
zub:zub               zub:zuʼùuʼ     <iv><neut>   #

zub:rzub              zub:rzùub      <iv><hab>    # "sit / sit down (in a location)"
zub:sub               zub:sùub       <iv><irre>   #
zub:zub               zub:zùub       <iv><neut>   #

zu:rzu                zu:rzuh        <iv><hab>    # "stand (in a location)
zu:su                 zu:suu         <iv><irre>   #
zu:zu                 zu:zuu         <iv><neut>   #

zugwa:rzugwa          zugwa:rzugwaʼah  <iv><hab>  # "stand (in a location)
zugwa:sugwa           zugwa:sugwaʼah   <iv><irre> #
zugwa:zugwa           zugwa:zugwaʼah   <iv><neut> #


LEXICON V-Copula(3)

na:na                 na:nàa         <neut>   #

LEXICON V-Stems(3)

ban               bàaʼan                   <iv>    # "follow a medical diet"
beb               bèeʼb                    <tv>    # "ride (an animal)"  # FIXME: irreg irrealis
bix               biʼihx                   <iv>    # "ring (of a bell)"
chiby             chìiby                   <tv>    # "scare"
culo              culoh                    <tv>    # "take care of"
culozac:culoza{C} culohzaʼc:culohzaʼ{C}    <tv>    # "take good care of"
cuzh              cuhzh                    <tv>    # "play (a wind instrument)"
cwany             cwàaʼnny                 <tv>    # "wake up"
cwez              cwèez                    <tv>    # "turn off"
cwual             cwùaʼll                  <tv>    # "turn on"
cyetlaz           cyeʼtlààaʼz              <iv>    # "be/get happy"
deidy:{D}eidy     dèèiʼdy:{D}èèiʼdy        <tv>    # "cross"  # FIXME: irreg irrealis
deidy:{l}deidy    dèèiʼdy:{l}dèèiʼdy       <dtv>   # "give"    # {l}:l in <prog>
deidy:{n}deidy    dèèiʼdy:{n}dèèiʼdy       <dtv>   # "give"    # {n}:n in <prog>  ! Dir/LR
dieby             dììeʼby                  <iv>    # "boil"
dily:{D}ily       dìiʼlly:{D}ìiʼlly        <tv>    # "fight with, scold"  # FIXME: irreg irrealis
dinal             dinàall                  <tv>    # "chase"
duax              duʼahx                   <iv>    # "bark"
dub:{l}dub        dùuʼb:{l}dùuʼb           <iv>    # "sweep"
dub:{n}dub        dùuʼb:{n}dùuʼb           <iv>    # "sweep"     ! Dir/LR
gap:{G}ap         gàaʼp:{G}àaʼp            <tv>    # "slap"
gats              gàaʼts                   <iv>    # "get buried"
guad              gùad                     <tv>    # "sting"
gub:{G}ub         gùùuʼb:{G}ùùuʼb          <tv>    # "suck; smoke; use a lot (of fuel)"
guch              guhch                    <tv>    # "bathe"
guez:{G}{u}ez     guèeʼez:{G}{u}èeʼez      <tv>    # "hug; carry (in arms)"
guiby:{G}{u}iby   guìiʼby:{G}{u}ìiʼby      <tv>    # "wash"
guieb:{G}{u}ieb   guìeb:{G}{u}ìeb          <tv>    # "sew"
guily:{G}{u}ily   guìiʼlly:{G}{u}ìiʼilly   <tv>    # "look for"  ! Dir/LR
guily:{G}{u}ily   guìiʼlly:{G}{u}ìiʼlly    <tv>    # "look for"
guiny:{G}{u}iny   guìiʼiny:{G}{u}ìiʼiny    <tv>    # "borrow; ask for hand (of girl) in marriage (in betrothal negotiation)"
guix:{G}{u}ix     guìiʼx:{G}{u}ìiʼx        <tv>    # "lay down, put down (long object)"
guixicy:{G}{u}ixicy  guixiʼihcy:{G}{u}ixiʼihcy  <iv>   # "nod off (to sleep)"
guizh:{G}{u}izh   guiʼihzh:{G}{u}iʼihzh    <dtv>   # "pay"
gwe               gwèèeʼ                   <iv>    # "speak"
gwezac:gweza{C}   gwèeʼzaʼc:gwèeʼzaʼc      <tv>    # "speak (a language) well"
gyan              gyaàaʼn                  <dtv>   # "feed"
eipy              eʼihpy                   <dtv>   # "call (someone) (a name)"
icy               iʼihcy                   <iv>    # "return"  # FIXME: check
nab               nààaʼb                   <tv>    # "ask/send for"
nalaz             nnahlààaʼz               <tv>    # "remember, miss (a person), think about"
naz               nnàaʼaz                  <tv>    # "grab"
ni                nììiʼ                    <tv>    # "say"
nudizh            nuhdìiʼzh                <tv>    # "ask of"
nyity             nyiʼihty                 <iv>    # "get lost, be missing"
nyity             nyiʼihty                 <tv>    # "lose, miss (a thing)"
reizh             rèeiʼizh                 <tv>    # "measure"
saguel            saguehll                 <iv>    # "be so good as to"
san               sàaʼan                   <tv>    # "leave behind"
seidy             sèèiʼdy                  <dtv>   # "teach"
seidy             sèèiʼdy                  <tv>    # "learn"
studian           studiʼaann               <tv>    # "student"
studian:estudian  studiʼaann:estudiʼaann   <tv>    # "student"
subiaz            subihahz                 <tv>    # "dry"
sudieby           sudììeʼby                <tv>    # "boil"
taz               tàaʼaz                   <tv>    # "hit"
teidy             tèèiʼdy                  <tv>    # "take/bring across"
tyepy             tyèeʼpy                  <iv>    # "whistle"
tyis              tyiʼihs                  <iv>    # "jump"
unybe             unybèe                   <tv>    # "know, get to know"
xyeily            xyeʼilly                 <tv>    # "open"
yan               yàaʼan                   <iv>    # "stay"
yac:ya{C}         yaʼahc:yaʼah{C}          <iv>    # "heal, get better/well"
yual              yuʼahll                  <iv>    # "pant"
yulaz             yuʼlààaʼz                <tv>    # "like"  # FIXME: not used with <perf>
zeny              zehnny                   <iv>    # "arrive"
zhiby             zhihby                   <iv>    # "get scared"
zhiez             rzhìez                   <iv>    # "laugh, smile"
zhuny             zh꞉ùuʼnny                <iv>    # "run; elope"
zhuny:zhyuny      zh꞉ùuʼnny:zhy꞉ùuʼnny     <iv>    # "run; elope"   # ! Dir/LR
zhyag             zhyàag                   <tv>    # "meet"
zhyeil            zhyeʼilly                <iv>    # "open"
zicy              ziʼihcy                  <dtv>   # "send (someone) back (somewhere)"
zilaz             zilààaʼz                 <tv>    # "used to think that"


LEXICON N-Stems-Possessed(2)
# These are "essentially possessed" nouns
# But also here are the irregular possessive forms of plain nouns
